Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 29. Public Property and Supplies
Executive Order No. 29-37
(No. 02-07) [Transfer of Certain Land and Rights in Orange from the Agency of Natural Resources to the Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, certain state-owned land (the “Property”) located in the Town of Orange, County of Orange and State of Vermont, described more particularly below, presently is under the jurisdiction and control of the State of Vermont, Agency of Natural Resources,
Department of Environmental Conservation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources has determined the Property to be surplus to its needs; and

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation desires to obtain jurisdiction and control of the Property for the purposes of replacing the existing maintenance buildings currently on the site.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Natural Resources to the Agency of Transportation for the above purposes, jurisdiction and
control of the following state-owned land:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Leroy E. Nelson by his Warranty Deed dated May 25, 1936, which is recorded in the land records of the Town of Orange in Book 22 Page 99, having been received for record on June
5, 1936.

The Property herein transferred is a parcel of land containing 6.1 acres, more or less, and is bounded southerly by U.S Route 302 (AKA William Scott Memorial Highway); westerly by Town Highway No. 1 (AKA Reservoir Road); northerly and easterly by lands
remaining under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Environmental Conservation. The herein transferred Property is more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at the point of intersection of the northerly right-of-way limit of U.S. Route 302 and the easterly right-of-way limit of Town Highway No. 1. Said point of intersection having a Vermont State Plane Grid coordinate (VSPG) of 602,371.03 feet North
and 1,658,746.05 feet East.

Thence running in and along the easterly right-of-way limit of said Town Highway No 1 the following seven courses:

N 25° 36´ 08" W - 238.61 feet to VSPG coordinate 602,586.21 feet North and 1,658,642.95 feet East, which point is 24.75 feet east of centerline PT Station 109+74.53;

51.14 feet along a curve to the left with a delta of 4° 55’ 36‘ and a radius of 594.75 feet to VSPG coordinate 602,631.32 feet North and 1,658,618.89 feet East, which point is 24.75 feet east of centerline PC Station 109+25.52;

N 30° 31´ 43" W - 231.35 feet to VSPG coordinate 602,830.60 feet North and 1,658,501.37 feet East, which point is 24.75 feet east of PT Station 106+94.17;

110.61 feet along a curve to the right with a delta of 11° 41´ 31" and a radius of 547.75 feet to VSPG coordinate 602,930.89 feet North and 1,658,455.15 feet East, which point is 24.75 feet east of centerline PC Station 105+77.33;

N 18° 50´ 12" W — 83.44 feet to VSPG coordinate 603,009.86 feet North and 1,658,428.21 feet East, which point is 24.75 feet east of PT Station 104+95.07;

393.54 feet along a curve to the right with a delta of 52° 00´ 00" and a radius of 432.62 feet to VSPG coordinate 603,387.06 feet North and 1,658,475.62 feet East, which point is 24.75 feet east of centerline PC Station 100+79.06;

N 33° 09´ 48" E — 79.98 feet to VSPG coordinate 603,454.02 feet North and 1,658,519.37 feet East, which point is 24.75 feet east of POT Station 100+00.00, and is the northwest corner of the parcel herein transferred. Said point is to be marked by an
Iron Pin to be set.

Thence turning and running along land remaining under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Environmental Conservation, the following four courses:

1.
S 58° 57´ 26" E — 271.47 feet to VSPG coordinate 603,314.02 feet North and 1,658,751.96 feet East, which point is to be marked by an Iron Pin to be set;

2.
S 11° 03´ 55" W — 63.44 feet to VSPG coordinate 603,251.77 feet North and 1,658,739.79 feet East, which point is to be marked by an Iron Pin to be set;

3.
S 70° 59´ 49" E — 50.00 feet along a fence to VSPG coordinate 603,314.02 feet North and 1,658,751.96 feet East, which point is to be marked by an Iron Pin to be set;

4.
S 00° 49´ 24" E — 888.87 feet to VSPG coordinate 602,346.93 feet North and 1,658,799.80 feet East, which point is to be marked by an Iron Pin to be set in the northerly right-of-way limit of the aforementioned
U.S. Route 302.

Thence turning and running along in the northerly right-of-way limit of said U.S. Route 302, N 65° 48´ 36" W — 71.18 feet to the point of beginning.

Also transferred to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation are any rights the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Environmental Conservation, may have in and to those lands located between the existing centerlines of U.S.
Route 302 and Town Highway No. 1, and the parcel herein described and transferred.

In addition to the above described land, also transferred hereby is the right to enforce the conditions and restrictions contained in a certain Quitclaim Deed from the State of Vermont to the Town of Orange dated July 13, 2005 and recorded in Book 45
at Page 327 of the Orange Land Records.

In aid of the above description, reference may be had to a survey entitled, in part, as follows:

STATE OF VERMONT
AGENCY OF TRANSPORTATION
ORANGE GARAGE
Scale: 1" = 50´
Date: 8/24/06

A copy of this survey is on file in the property records of the Agency of Transportation, located in Montpelier, Vermont.

The herein described parcel of land is transferred subject to all existing licenses, leases, and easements, including, but not limited to, the present agricultural use of a portion of the herein transferred parcel.

The remaining portion of the former Leroy E. Nelson property shall remain under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated March 28, 2007.

Executive Order No. 29-38
(No. 07-07) [Transfer of Land in Lowell from the Agency of Transportation to the Agency of Natural Resources.

WHEREAS, certain state-owned land (the “Property”) located in the Town of Lowell, County of Orleans and State of Vermont, described more particularly below, presently is under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation has determined the Property to be surplus to its needs; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources desires to obtain jurisdiction and control of the Property for the purposes of using it in a legislatively approved land swap with the abutting property owner, Chip Percy.

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Transportation to the Agency of Natural Resources for the above purposes, jurisdiction and
control of the following state-owned land:

Being all of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Leo S. and Ruth S. Stearns by Warranty Deed dated June 26, 1958, which is recorded in the land records of the Town of Lowell in Book 23 Page 33, having been received for record
on August 6, 1958, and therein more particularly described as follows:

“Beginning at a point in the northwesterly boundary of the present highway Vermont Route 100, 85 feet distant measured at right angle from survey station 1194 + 10 of the established center line of Highway Project Lowell F 79(9);

Thence 90 feet, more or less, N 33°-08´ W to a point,

Thence 40 feet, more or less, N 46°-08´ W to a point;

Thence 335 feet, more or less, N 57°-23´ W to a point;

Thence 55 feet, more or less, N 26°-43´ W to a point;

Thence 65 feet, more or less, N 00°-32´ E to a point;

Thence 50 feet, more or less, N 50°-17´ E to a point;

Thence 600 feet, more or less, N 62°-02´ E to a point;

Thence 422 feet, more or less, N 52°-32´ E to a point;

Thence 240 feet, more or less, N 45°-47´E to a point;

Thence 44 feet, more or less, N 58°-47´ E to a point;

Thence 55 feet, more or less, N 71°-32´ E to a point, said point believed to be in the property line between said grantors and Clayton H. and Florence E. Hoadley;

Thence 250 feet, more or less, S 42°-38´ E in said believed property line to a point in the northwesterly boundary of the present highway Vermont Route 100 aforesaid, said point also being 70 feet distant northwesterly measured at right angle from survey
station 1180 + 58 of said established center line;

Thence 450 feet, more or less, S 43°-22´ W in said northwesterly highway boundary to a point 70 feet distant northwesterly measured at right angle from survey station 1185 + 00 of said established center line;

Thence 215 feet, more or less, S 65°-22´ W to a point 150 feet, more or less, distant northwesterly measured at right angle from survey station 1187 + 00 of said established center line;

Thence 712 feet, more or less, S 38°-52´ W to the point of beginning. Said parcel to contain 8 acres, more or less.”

Excepted and reserved from this transfer is the right of the Agency of Transportation to construct, inspect, maintain, and replace culverts at or near stations 1181 + 50 and 1184 + 50 of the centerline of Vermont Route 100, as established by Highway Project
Lowell F 79(9).

Reference may be made to a plan entitled “Wayside Rest Area, Site No. 12-1, Lowell Vermont, Fund 25.12,” and to sheets 25 and 26 of 89 sheets of the plans for Highway Project Lowell F 79(9), on file in the property records of the Agency of Transportation
and the Town of Lowell’s land records.

The Property is a parcel of land known locally as “Fiddler’s Elbow” containing 8 acres, more or less, and is bounded northerly by the present Vermont Route 100 and otherwise bounded by the former Vermont Route 100.

The fee simple absolute interest of the herein described parcel of land is transferred subject to the afore-mentioned culvert easements and all existing licenses, leases, and easements.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated November 6, 2007.

Executive Order No. 29-39
(No. 02-08) [Transfer of Land in Bennington from the Agency of Transportation to the Agency of Natural Resources.

WHEREAS, certain lands and rights hereinafter described and located in the Town of Bennington, County of Bennington, and State of Vermont, and known as Whipstock Hill, are presently under the jurisdiction and control of the State of Vermont, Agency of
Transportation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires to transfer to the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, a certain parcel of land to be used as a deer wintering area; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife will, upon transfer, be responsible for the management of a designated deer wintering habitat area and associated forested habitat buffer zone, on the parcel described below;

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, a parcel of land, being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same lands and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation by Woodland Heights Realty Company by Warranty Deed dated March 16, 2000, which is recorded in Book 359, Page 155 of the Town of Bennington Land Records,
and being more particularly described as follows:

Being a parcel of land, as shown on a plat entitled “Bennington - Hoosick, NY D.P.I. 0146(1) Whipstock Hill Deer Mitigation Unit” date of Survey: November 15, 2005 and which plat is dated September 6, 2007 and attached hereto and made a part hereof.

Being Parcel #1B2 consisting of 349.7 Acres, more or less, and Parcel #1B3 consisting of 75.1 Acres, more or less, land and rights therein, as shown on the aforementioned plans of said Highway Project Bennington - Hoosick, NY D.P.I. 0146(1) to be recorded
in the office of the Clerk of the Town of Bennington.

Reference also may be made to Parcel 1B as shown on pages 43-48 of the plans of Highway Project Bennington-Hoosick D.P.I. 0146(1) as filed in the office of the Clerk of the Town of Bennington in aid of a more complete description.

Except and reserved from this transfer is the continued right on the part of the State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation to:

— limit access, air, view and light, including all rights of ingress, egress and regress to, from, between and across the above described parcel and the limited-access highway facility known as Vermont Route 279.

— limit building of any structures over a maximum elevation above sea level of 840 feet.

Also excepted and reserved from this transfer are rights to build, maintain, and replace a certain air navigation beacon, along with a right-of-way to the beacon, all as more particularly described in a Warranty Deed dated March 8, 1973 from Ferdinand
L. Mayer and Katherine D. Mayer to the State of Vermont Aeronautics Board, which is recorded in Book 0-201 and Page 174 of the land records of the Town of Bennington.

In the event that the parcel of land transferred by this executive order is not used for the purposes described above, it will revert to the control of the Agency of Transportation.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated April 10, 2008.

Executive Order No. 29-40
(No. 03-08) [Transfer of Land in Topsham from Agency of Transportation to Department of Public Safety.

WHEREAS, certain state-owned land (the “Property”) located in the Town of Topsham, County of Orange and State of Vermont, described more particularly below, presently is under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation has determined the Property to be surplus to its needs; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Public Safety desires to obtain jurisdiction and control of the Property for the purposes of consolidating control over all radio tower properties used by the Department of Public Safety.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, James H. Douglas, by the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Transportation to the Department of Public Safety, for the above purposes, jurisdiction
and control of the following state-owned land:

Being all and the same land and premises conveyed by July 5, 1963 warranty deed of Hall, Rose, and John Peterson to the State of Vermont, which is recorded in the Topsham land records at Book 34, Page 338, having been received for record on July 5, 1963.
This parcel, which contains 10.0 acres more or less, is more particularly described as follows:

“Beginning at a point in the northerly boundary of a road (not a town highway but surveyed as referenced below), which point is approximately 0.24 mile westerly from Town Highway 38;

Thence 385 feet, more or less, northerly and along a fence line to a point marked by an iron pin;

Thence along a tangent N 80° 00´ W (magnetic) a distance of 576.84 feet to a point marked by an iron pin;

Thence along a tangent N 10° 00´ E (magnetic) a distance of 100.00 feet to a point marked by an iron pin;

Thence along a tangent N 80° 00´ W (magnetic) a distance of 200.00 feet to a point marked by an iron pin;

Thence along a tangent S 10° 00 W (magnetic) a distance of 368.88 feet to a point marked by an iron pin;

Thence along a tangent S 10° 00 W a distance of 426.18 feet to a point marked by an iron pin;

Thence along a tangent S 10° 00 W to the northerly boundary of the present ancient road;

Thence 860 feet, more or less, easterly in said northerly ancient road boundary to the point of beginning.”

Also transferred to the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Public Safety are any rights the Agency of Transportation may have in and to those lands located between the existing Town Highway 38 and the parcel herein described and transferred.

In aid of the above description, reference may be had to two surveys entitled, in part, as follows:

STATE OF VERMONT TOPSHAM

Department of Highways Pierson Hill

Town of Topsham Micro-wave relay station

survey

Project: Topsham 550-0713 By L. Carlson

Scale: 1" = 100´ May 1958

Date: 9/10/1974

Copies of these surveys are on file in the property records of Vermont Agency of Transportation’s Division of Operations, located in Montpelier, Vermont.

Reference may also be had to a survey at Book 34, Pages 330-31 of the Topsham land records.

The herein described parcel of land is transferred subject to all existing licenses, leases, and easements, including, but not limited to, a lease with Washington Electric Cooperative, Inc. for use of the tower to maintain an antenna.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated June 27, 2008.

Executive Order No. 29-41
(No. 06-08) [Transfer of Right of Way in Okemo State Forest, Ludlow, from the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

WHEREAS, the Department of Fish and Wildlife has secured a right of way across the lands of Robin Anderson, in part with Federal funds received from the Wildlife Restoration Grant Program under Application for Federal Assistance W-58-L-1 administered
by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, for access for itself and the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation from Town Highway #14, aka Rod and Gun Club Road, to certain state-owned land known as the former “Yankee Parcel”, and

WHEREAS, the southern portion of the former “Yankee Parcel” is now owned by the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation and managed as part of Okemo State Forest, located in the Town of Ludlow, County of Windsor and State of Vermont; and

WHEREAS, the northern portion of the former “Yankee Parcel” is now owned and managed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife as part of Tiny Pond Wildlife Management Area in the town of Ludlow, County of Windsor and State of Vermont; and

WHEREAS, the right of way across the lands of Robin Anderson was acquired for the purpose of improving access for wildlife habitat management and lands administration on the Tiny Pond Wildlife Management Area; and

WHEREAS, the southern portion of the “Yankee Parcel” contains existing wood roads that connect to Tiny Pond Wildlife Management Area; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation wishes to convey a right of way to the Department of Fish and Wildlife to cross the southern portion of the “Yankee Parcel” to access Tiny Pond Wildlife Management Area.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the Department of Fish and Wildlife, both in the Agency
of Natural Resources, for the above purposes, a general right of way across the southern portion of the “Yankee Parcel” over Okemo State Forest for the purpose of accessing Tiny Pond Wildlife Management Area for wildlife habitat management
and lands administration, to wit:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont, Agency of Natural Resources by the following instrument:

Limited Warranty Deed from The Trust for Public Land d/b/a Trust for Public Land Inc., dated December 31, 2002, which is recorded in Book 230, Pages 577-581.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated December 16, 2008.

Executive Order No. 29-42
(No. 04-09) [Transfer of Certain Land and Easements and Rights in the Town of Cornwall
from the Agency of Natural Resources to the Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain pieces of land and easements and/or rights on land hereinafter described and located in the Town of Cornwall, County of Addison, and the State of Vermont are presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of
Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires the use of said land and easements and/or rights on lands for its purposes in connection with the construction of Transportation Project Cornwall BRS 0172(6).

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Transportation jurisdiction and control over certain land and easements and/or rights on land of the Agency
of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife for its purpose, said land and easements and/or rights being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife by U.S. Department of Agriculture, Farm Service Agency by Quit Claim Deed, dated February 18, 2004, which is recorded in Book 59, Pages 412-417 of the Town of
Cornwall land records.

Reference is hereby made to the above-mentioned conveyance and records thereof and to the following instruments of conveyance in aid of a more complete description and further chain of title:

Certificate of Non-Redemption, dated July 22, 1996, certified July 25, 1996 and recorded in Book 42, Page 586; Decree of Foreclosure, dated June 12, 1996, certified July 25, 1996 and recorded in Book 42, Pages 587-590; and Compliant of Foreclosure dated
January 11, 1995 and recorded in Book 42, Pages 178-310, all in the matter of United States of America v. Jack W. Whipple, Helen P. Whipple and the Merchants Bank, Docket No. 2:95cv14, United States District Court, District of Vermont;

Warranty Deed from Margaret A. Payne to Jack Whipple and Helen Whipple, dated October 26, 1972, which is of record in Book 23, Pages 253-256;

all of the Town of Cornwall land records, and being more particularly described as follows:

• Being Parcels #1A-1E consisting of 0.483 hectare (1.20 acre), more or less, land and rights therein, as shown on right-of-way detail sheet 1 and right-of-way sheets 26, 27 and 30 of the plans of Transportation Project Cornwall BRS 0172(6) (“the Transportation
Project”) to be filed in the office of the clerk of the Town of Cornwall, subsequently upon the execution of this instrument.

In connection with the above parcels the following easements and/or rights are conveyed:

Permanent easements, in an area of 319 square meters (3,434 square feet), more or less, located left of and between approximate stations 1+095.2 and 1+139.7 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project; in an area of 147 square meters (1,582
square feet), more or less, located right of and between approximate stations 2+045.9 and 2+117.8 of the Town Highway 33 centerline of the Transportation Project; to install, construct, reconstruct, operate, repair, maintain, replace,
patrol and remove overhead or underground cable, lines, conduits, poles, guys, anchors, braces, fixtures, and appurtenances thereto, herein referred to as facilities, as necessary for the transmission of power and telecommunications
under, upon, or across land of the grantor. These easements also include the perpetual right to cut, trim, and remove all trees, shrubs, bushes, underbrush, and other items, as determined necessary by the State of Vermont, for the
safe and efficient operation and maintenance of the facilities. The grantor, its successors and assigns, will not, without the prior written permission of the State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation, erect or permit the erection
of any building or any other structure; plant or permit the growth of any trees or bushes; change the grade or permit the change of grade, or fill or excavate within these easement areas which will adversely affect the maintenance
and operation by the State of Vermont, its successors and assigns.

A temporary easement, during the period of construction to enter upon land of the grantor, for construction purposes, including the right to cut and dispose of all trees, down timber, stubs, brush, bushes, and debris, install project demarcation fence,
as necessary; and undertake general construction functions, in an area of 55 square meters (592 square feet), more or less, located right of and between approximate stations 1+165.2 and 1+190.4; in an area of 200 square meters (2,153
square feet), more or less, located right of and between approximate stations 2+023.6 and 2+103.0 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A temporary easement in an area of 0.2 square meters (2 square feet), more or less, to enter upon land of the grantor, during the period of construction, to construct and use a temporary vehicular detour right of and between approximate stations 1+165.2
and 1+190.4 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A temporary easement, during the period of construction, to extend highway slopes and embankments in an area of 150 square meters (1,615 square feet), more or less, as shown on the aforesaid Transportation Project plans.

The slopes and embankments may be extended at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. The State of Vermont shall have the right to remove
all trees, logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff and other objectionable materials, structures, growth and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from said slope area.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated June 17, 2009.

Executive Order No. 29-43
(No. 05-09) [Transfer of Land in Duxbury, Vermont from the Vermont Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the Vermont Department of Buildings and General Services.

WHEREAS, certain state-owned land (the “Property”) located in the Town of Duxbury, County of Washington and State of Vermont, described more particularly below, presently is under the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation;
and

WHEREAS, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation has determined the Property to be surplus to its needs; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Buildings and General Services desires to obtain jurisdiction and control of the Property for the purposes of including the Property as part of the legislatively approved sale of abutting parcels of land known as the Duxbury
State Farm.

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the Department of Buildings and General Services for the above purposes,
jurisdiction and control of the following state-owned land:

Meaning to transfer only those lands easterly of Route 100B under the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation pursuant to Executive Order #11 dated May 2, 1973 and signed by Governor Thomas P. Salmon and as depicted
on the map attached thereto and incorporated by reference herein.

Excepted and reserved from this transfer are all lands lying westerly of Route 100B under the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation pursuant to said Executive Order #11 of 1973.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated June 27, 2009.

EXECUTIVE ORDER

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Duxbury, County of Washington, State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction of the VERMONT STATE HOSPITAL or the DIVISION OF STATE BUILDINGS, pursuant
to Act #260, Section 51 of the Acts of 1971, has become and is no longer necessary to the Hospital for agricultural or woodland purposes:

NOW, THEREFORE, pursuant to the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont, I, Thomas P. Salmon, do by this my Order, transfer and set over from the VERMONT STATE HOSPITAL of the DIVISION OF STATE BUILDING to the jurisdiction of the DEPARTMENT OF FORESTS
AND PARKS, a part of the Agency of Environmental Conservation for its use and purposes the following described land and premises to wit:

All lands westerly of a line as shown on the map attached hereto and made a part of this transfer excepting therefrom any small areas of agricultural land presently under lease by the Division of State Buildings to Raphael M. and Joyce S. Lowe and such
area as is needed for the State Hospital Summer camp. Any necessary right-of-way through the camp area to manage the woodland hereby conveyed shall have mutual agreement between the State Department using such right-of-way and a written
agreement executed.

Also the woodland as shown on said map lying southerly of the main farm land and easterly of State Route 100.

In transferring this land to the Department of Forests and Parks said Department shall use reasonable care that snowmobiles and other motorized vehicles and their rubbish is diverted away from agricultural areas under lease.

Dated May 2, 1973

Display Image

Click to view

IMAGE

Click to view

Executive Order No. 29-44
(No. 03-10) [Inter-Agency Tenant Committee for State-Owned Space.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont currently owns and operates nearly four million square feet of space; and

WHEREAS, Section 269 of No. 152 Acts of 2000 authorized the creation of a Facilities Operations Revolving fund to appropriately reflect total space costs within State agency budgets, allocating the expenses by means of a rental charge to tenant State
agencies (a “fee-for-space”); and

WHEREAS, the fee-for-space rates include maintenance and custodial services provided by the Department of Buildings and General Services to tenant agencies; and

WHEREAS, tenant State agencies seek a voice in the operation of their respective buildings, including staffing and scheduled repairs and maintenance, as well as a vehicle to find and implement efficiencies in such operations; and

WHEREAS, an on-going and collaborative effort with Department of Buildings and General Services and tenant agencies can result in space cost savings for tenant agencies;

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby establish an Inter-Agency Tenant Committee for State-Owned Space (hereinafter the Tenant Committee).

The Tenant Committee, appointed by respective agency and department heads, shall consist of representatives from tenant State agencies and departments to include the Agency of Administration, the Agency of Human Services; the Agency of Natural Resources;
the Agency of Transportation; the Department of Corrections; the Department of Education; the Department of Public Safety; and the Judiciary. The Governor shall appoint the Chair.

Administrative support to the Tenant Committee shall be provided by the Department of Buildings and General Services.

The Tenant Committee shall be advisory to the Governor, and shall meet at least quarterly or at the call of the Chair. The Committee shall have the following functions and duties:

To engage tenant State agencies directly in the operational and financial management of their respective buildings and oversight of the Facilities Operations Revolving Fund.

To advise the Department of Buildings and General Services on the operation of state-owned buildings, including staffing and scheduled repairs and maintenance, in order to improve operations, save money and more fully meet the needs of tenant State agencies.

To review annually, and make recommendations to the Commissioner on appropriate levels-of-service provided and fee-for-space rates charged to tenant State agencies.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall expire on June 30, 2014.

Dated June 22, 2010.

Executive Order No. 29-45
(No. 05-10) [Transfer of Certain Easements and Rights in the Town of Cambridge
from the Agency of Natural Resources to the Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain easements and/or rights on land hereinafter described and located in the Town of Cambridge, County of Lamoille, and the State of Vermont are presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources,
Department of Fish and Wildlife (Grantor); and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation (VTrans) desires the use of certain easements and/or rights on Grantor’s lands for VTrans’ purposes in connection with the construction of Transportation Project Cambridge BRF 027-1 (4).

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Transportation jurisdiction and control of certain easements and/or rights on lands presently
under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, said easements and/or rights being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to State of Vermont, Fish and Wildlife Department by the Warranty Deed of Raymond R. Unsworth, dated December 23, 1985, which is recorded in Book 68, Page 503 of the Town of Cambridge land records, and
being more particularly described as follows:

Being Parcel #2 consisting of easements and/or rights on land, as shown on right-of-way sheets 23, 25 and 26 of the revised plans of Transportation Projects Cambridge BRF 027-1(4) and Cambridge STP 027-1(4) as filed on the 22rd day of June, 2010, in the
office of the clerk of the Town of Cambridge.

In connection with the above parcel the following easements and/or rights are conveyed:

A permanent easement in an area of 1,057.65 square meters (0.26 acre), more or less, and located right of and between approximate stations 10+235.00 and 10+344.06 of the established centerline of Transportation Project Cambridge BRF 027-1(4) (“the Transportation
Project”), to install, construct, reconstruct, operate, repair, maintain, replace, patrol and remove overhead or underground cable, lines, conduits, poles, guys, anchors, braces, fixtures, and appurtenances thereto, hereinafter referred
to as facilities, as necessary for the transmission of power and telecommunications under, upon, or across land of the Grantor. This easement also includes the perpetual right to cut, trim, and remove all trees, shrubs, bushes, underbrush,
and other items, as determined necessary by VTrans for the safe and efficient operation and maintenance of the facilities. The Grantor, its successors and assigns, will not, without the prior written permission of VTrans, erect or
permit the erection of any building or any other structure; plant or permit the growth of any trees or bushes; change the grade or permit the change of grade, or fill or excavate within this easement area which will adversely affect
the maintenance and operation by VTrans, its successors and assigns.

A temporary easement during the period of construction to extend highway slopes and embankments in an area of 151.82 square meters (1,634 square feet), more or less, and a permanent easement to extend and maintain highway slopes and embankments in an
area of 166.58 square meters (0.04 acre), more or less, as shown on the plans for the Transportation Project.

VTrans may extend the slopes and embankments at such an angle as will hold the material of the slopes in repose against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. VTrans shall have the right to remove all trees,
logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff, and other objectionable materials, structures, growth, and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from the slope areas.

A temporary easement to enter upon land of the Grantor, during the period of construction, to install a barrier fence, right of and between approximate stations 10+259.55 and 10+344.06 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Grantor, for construction purposes, including the right to cut and dispose of all trees, down timber, stubs, brush, bushes, and debris, install erosion control barriers,
as necessary and as noted on the project plans; and undertake general construction functions in an area of 78.72 square meters (847 square feet), more or less, right of and between approximate stations 10+260.00 and 10+344.06 of the
established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A temporary easement to enter upon land of the Grantor, during the period of construction, to install a sidewalk, in an area of 13.87 square meters (149 square feet), more or less, right of and between approximate stations 10+310.00 and 10+323.50 of the
established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A permanent easement to install and maintain a guy wire and anchor at or near and right of approximate station 10+343.42 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A permanent easement to install and maintain guardrail right of and between approximate stations 10+308.00 and 10+314.00 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A temporary easement to enter upon land of the Grantor, during the period of construction, to remove and reset a Department of Fish & Wildlife sign, at or near and right of approximate station 10+300.00 of the established centerline of the Transportation
Project.

A temporary easement to enter upon land of the Grantor, during the period of construction, to remove a picnic sign, at or near and right of approximate station 10+313.00 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

Construction of the Transportation Project will eliminate the Grantor’s existing access located at or near and right of approximate station 10+309 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project. To mitigate elimination of the Grantor’s access
to Vermont Route 108, VTrans will allow the Grantor the right to use an access to be located at or near and right of approximate station 10+470 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project and the existing parking area.
VTrans also will construct a recreational path to connect land of VTrans and land of the Grantor, and provide further access to Grantor from the parking area to the adjacent land of the Grantor.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated July 2, 2010.